vendor/wikimedia/langconv/fst/crh-exceptions-save.foma
  {gresovskiy} @-> {грэсовский} ,,
  {Gresovskiy} @-> {Грэсовский} ,,
  {GRESOVSKİY} @-> {ГРЭСОВСКИЙ} ,,
  {grits} @-> {гриц} ,,
  {Grits} @-> {Гриц} ,,
  {GRİTS} @-> {ГРИЦ} ,,
  {gürci} @-> {гурджи} ,,
  {Gürci} @-> {Гурджи} ,,
  {GÜRCİ} @-> {ГУРДЖИ} ,,
  {igor} @-> {игорь} ,,
  {İgor} @-> {Игорь} ,,
  {İGOR} @-> {ИГОРЬ} ,,
  {ilyiç} @-> {ильич} ,,
  {İlyiç} @-> {Ильич} ,,
  {İLYİÇ} @-> {ИЛЬИЧ} ,,
  {ilyin} @-> {ильин} ,,
  {İlyin} @-> {Ильин} ,,
  {İLYİN} @-> {ИЛЬИН} ,,
  {ismail} @-> {исмаил} ,,
  {İsmail} @-> {Исмаил} ,,
  {İSMAİL} @-> {ИСМАИЛ} ,,
  {kitts} @-> {киттс} ,,
  {Kitts} @-> {Киттс} ,,
  {KİTTS} @-> {КИТТС} ,,
  {komsomolsk} @-> {комсомольск} ,,
  {Komsomolsk} @-> {Комсомольск} ,,
  {KOMSOMOLSK} @-> {КОМСОМОЛЬСК} ,,
  {körbekülü} @-> {корьбекулю} ,,
  {Körbekülü} @-> {Корьбекулю} ,,
  {KÖRBEKÜLÜ} @-> {КОРЬБЕКУЛЮ} ,,
  {kunitsın} @-> {куницын} ,,
  {Kunitsın} @-> {Куницын} ,,
  {KUNİTSIN} @-> {КУНИЦЫН} ,,
  {lviv} @-> {львив} ,,
  {Lviv} @-> {Львив} ,,
  {LVİV} @-> {ЛЬВИВ} ,,
  {lvov} @-> {львов} ,,
  {Lvov} @-> {Львов} ,,
  {LVOV} @-> {ЛЬВОВ} ,,
  {maryino} @-> {марьино} ,,
  {Maryino} @-> {Марьино} ,,
  {MARYİNO} @-> {МАРЬИНО} ,,
  {mahuldür} @-> {махульдюр} ,,
  {Mahuldür} @-> {Махульдюр} ,,
  {MAHULDÜR} @-> {МАХУЛЬДЮР} ,,
  {pavel} @-> {павел} ,,
  {Pavel} @-> {Павел} ,,
  {PAVEL} @-> {ПАВЕЛ} ,,
  {pantikapeyon} @-> {пантикапейон} ,,
  {Pantikapeyon} @-> {Пантикапейон} ,,
  {PANTİKAPEYON} @-> {ПАНТИКАПЕЙОН} ,,
  {qurtseyit} @-> {къуртсейит} ,,
  {Qurtseyit} @-> {Къуртсейит} ,,
  {QURTSEYİT} @-> {КЪУРТСЕЙИТ} ,,
  {qurtseit} @-> {къуртсеит} ,,
  {Qurtseit} @-> {Къуртсеит} ,,
  {QURTSEİT} @-> {КЪУРТСЕИТ} ,,
  {smail} @-> {смаил} ,,
  {Smail} @-> {Смаил} ,,
  {SMAİL} @-> {СМАИЛ} ,,
  {sovetsk} @-> {советск} ,,
  {Sovetsk} @-> {Советск} ,,
  {SOVETSK} @-> {СОВЕТСК} ,,
  {şemi-zade} @-> {шемьи-заде} ,,
  {Şemi-zade} @-> {Шемьи-заде} ,,
  {ŞEMİ-ZADE} @-> {ШЕМЬИ-ЗАДЕ} ,,
  {tsvana} @-> {тсвана} ,,
  {Tsvana} @-> {Тсвана} ,,
  {TSVANA} @-> {ТСВАНА} ,,
  {üçevli} @-> {учьэвли} ,,
  {Üçevli} @-> {Учьэвли} ,,
  {ÜÇEVLİ} @-> {УЧЬЭВЛИ} ,,
  {yohan} @-> {йохан} ,,
  {Yohan} @-> {Йохан} ,,
  {YOHAN} @-> {ЙОХАН} ,,
  {york} @-> {йорк} ,,
  {York} @-> {Йорк} ,,
  {YORK} @-> {ЙОРК} ,,
  {vinnıtsâ} @-> {винныця} ,,
  {Vinnıtsâ} @-> {Винныця} ,,
  {VİNNITSÂ} @-> {ВИННЫЦЯ} ,,
  {vinnitsa} @-> {винница} ,,
  {Vinnitsa} @-> {Винница} ,,
  {VİNNİTSA} @-> {ВИННИЦА} ,,
  {hmelnitsk} @-> {хмельницк} ,,
  {Hmelnitsk} @-> {Хмельницк} ,,
  {HMELNİTSK} @-> {ХМЕЛЬНИЦК} ,,
  {hmelnıtsk} @-> {хмельныцк} ,,
  {Hmelnıtsk} @-> {Хмельныцк} ,,
  {HMELNITSK} @-> {ХМЕЛЬНЫЦК} ,,
  {zaytse} @-> {зайце} ,,
  {Zaytse} @-> {Зайце} ,,
  {ZAYTSE} @-> {ЗАЙЦЕ} ,,
  {çistenk} @-> {чистеньк} ,,
  {Çistenk} @-> {Чистеньк} ,,
  {ÇİSTENK} @-> {ЧИСТЕНЬК} ,,
  {kolçug} @-> {кольчуг} ,,
  {Kolçug} @-> {Кольчуг} ,,
  {KOLÇUG} @-> {КОЛЬЧУГ} ,,
  {ruçyi} @-> {ручьи} ,,
  {Ruçyi} @-> {Ручьи} ,,
  {RUÇYİ} @-> {РУЧЬИ} ,,
  {botsvana} @-> {ботсвана} ,,
  {Botsvana} @-> {Ботсвана} ,,
  {BOTSVANA} @-> {БОТСВАНА} ,,
  {bolşoy} @-> {большой} ,,
  {Bolşoy} @-> {Большой} ,,
  {BOLŞOY} @-> {БОЛЬШОЙ} ,,
  {bolşoye} @-> {большое} ,,
  {Bolşoye} @-> {Большое} ,,
  {BOLŞOYE} @-> {БОЛЬШОЕ} ,,
  {bolşaya} @-> {большая} ,,
  {Bolşaya} @-> {Большая} ,,
  {BOLŞAYA} @-> {БОЛЬШАЯ} ,,
  {uşçelye} @-> {ущелье} ,,
  {Uşçelye} @-> {Ущелье} ,,
  {UŞÇELYE} @-> {УЩЕЛЬЕ} ,,
  {uşçelnoye} @-> {ущельное} ,,
  {Uşçelnoye} @-> {Ущельное} ,,
  {UŞÇELNOYE} @-> {УЩЕЛЬНОЕ} ,,
  {preduşçelnoye} @-> {предущельное} ,,
  {Preduşçelnoye} @-> {Предущельное} ,,
  {PREDUŞÇELNOYE} @-> {ПРЕДУЩЕЛЬНОЕ} ,,
  {novenkoye} @-> {новенькое} ,,
  {Novenkoye} @-> {Новенькое} ,,
  {NOVENKOYE} @-> {НОВЕНЬКОЕ} ,,
  {novoselts} @-> {новосельц} ,,
  {Novoselts} @-> {Новосельц} ,,
  {NOVOSELTS} @-> {НОВОСЕЛЬЦ} ,,
  {melko} @-> {мелко} ,,
  {Melko} @-> {Мелко} ,,
  {MELKO} @-> {МЕЛКО} ,,
  {ovoşç} @-> {овощ} ,,
  {Ovoşç} @-> {Овощ} ,,
  {OVOŞÇ} @-> {ОВОЩ} ,,
  {perepölk} @-> {перепёлк} ,,
  {Perepölk} @-> {Перепёлк} ,,
  {PEREPÖLK} @-> {ПЕРЕПЁЛК} ,,
  {roşçin} @-> {рощин} ,,
  {Roşçin} @-> {Рощин} ,,
  {ROŞÇİN} @-> {РОЩИН} ,,
  {bratsk} @-> {братск} ,,
  {Bratsk} @-> {Братск} ,,
  {BRATSK} @-> {БРАТСК} ,,
  {krasnoflotsk} @-> {краснофлотск} ,,
  {Krasnoflotsk} @-> {Краснофлотск} ,,
  {KRASNOFLOTSK} @-> {КРАСНОФЛОТСК} ,,
  {sinitsin} @-> {синицин} ,,
  {Sinitsin} @-> {Синицин} ,,
  {SİNİTSİN} @-> {СИНИЦИН} ,,
  {sinitsın} @-> {синицын} ,,
  {Sinitsın} @-> {Синицын} ,,
  {SİNİTSIN} @-> {СИНИЦЫН} ,,
  {lgov} @-> {льгов} ,,
  {Lgov} @-> {Льгов} ,,
  {LGOV} @-> {ЛЬГОВ} ,,
  {jelto} @-> {желто} ,,
  {Jelto} @-> {Желто} ,,
  {JELTO} @-> {ЖЕЛТО} ,,
  {jölt} @-> {жёлт} ,,
  {Jölt} @-> {Жёлт} ,,
  {JÖLT} @-> {ЖЁЛТ} ,,
  {perm} @-> {пермь} ,,
  {Perm} @-> {Пермь} ,,
  {PERM} @-> {ПЕРМЬ} ,,
  {soldatsk} @-> {солдатск} ,,
  {Soldatsk} @-> {Солдатск} ,,
  {SOLDATSK} @-> {СОЛДАТСК} ,,
  {koltso} @-> {кольцо} ,,
  {Koltso} @-> {Кольцо} ,,
  {KOLTSO} @-> {КОЛЬЦО} ,,
  {şelko} @-> {шелко} ,,
  {Şelko} @-> {Шелко} ,,
  {ŞELKO} @-> {ШЕЛКО} ,,
  {ohotsk} @-> {охотск} ,,
  {Ohotsk} @-> {Охотск} ,,
  {OHOTSK} @-> {ОХОТСК} ,,
  {mariy el} @-> {марий эл} ,,
  {Mariy el} @-> {Марий эл} ,,
  {MARİY EL} @-> {МАРИЙ ЭЛ} ,,
  {mariupol} @-> {мариуполь} ,,
  {Mariupol} @-> {Мариуполь} ,,
  {MARİUPOL} @-> {МАРИУПОЛЬ} ,,
  {belgorod} @-> {белгород} ,,
  {Belgorod} @-> {Белгород} ,,
  {BELGOROD} @-> {БЕЛГОРОД} ,,
  {irkutsk} @-> {иркутск} ,,
  {İrkutsk} @-> {Иркутск} ,,
  {İRKUTSK} @-> {ИРКУТСК} ,,
  {oröl} @-> {орёл} ,,
  {Oröl} @-> {Орёл} ,,
  {ORÖL} @-> {ОРЁЛ} ,,
  {râzansk} @-> {рязанск} ,,
  {Râzansk} @-> {Рязанск} ,,
  {RÂZANSK} @-> {РЯЗАНСК} ,,
  {râzan} @-> {рязань} ,,
  {Râzan} @-> {Рязань} ,,
  {RÂZAN} @-> {РЯЗАНЬ} ,,
  {tversk} @-> {тверск} ,,
  {Tversk} @-> {Тверск} ,,
  {TVERSK} @-> {ТВЕРСК} ,,
  {tver} @-> {тверь} ,,
  {Tver} @-> {Тверь} ,,
  {TVER} @-> {ТВЕРЬ} ,,
  {yaroslavl} @-> {ярославль} ,,
  {Yaroslavl} @-> {Ярославль} ,,
  {YAROSLAVL} @-> {ЯРОСЛАВЛЬ} ,,
  {blagoveşçe} @-> {благовеще} ,,
  {Blagoveşçe} @-> {Благовеще} ,,
  {BLAGOVEŞÇE} @-> {БЛАГОВЕЩЕ} ,,
  {maldiv} @-> {мальдив} ,,
  {Maldiv} @-> {Мальдив} ,,
  {MALDİV} @-> {МАЛЬДИВ} ,,
  {balbek} @-> {бальбек} ,,
  {Balbek} @-> {Бальбек} ,,
  {BALBEK} @-> {БАЛЬБЕК} ,,
  {alçik} @-> {альчик} ,,
  {Alçik} @-> {Альчик} ,,
  {ALÇİK} @-> {АЛЬЧИК} ,,
  {harkov} @-> {харьков} ,,
  {Harkov} @-> {Харьков} ,,
  {HARKOV} @-> {ХАРЬКОВ} ,,
  {volınsk} @-> {волынск} ,,
  {Volınsk} @-> {Волынск} ,,
  {VOLINSK} @-> {ВОЛЫНСК} ,,
  {volın} @-> {волынь} ,,
  {Volın} @-> {Волынь} ,,
  {VOLIN} @-> {ВОЛЫНЬ} ,,
  {QMC} @-> {КъМДж} ,,
  {QC} @-> {КъДж} ,,
  {QAE} @-> {КъАЭ} ,,
  {ĞSMK} @-> {ГъСМК} ,,
  {ŞSCB} @-> {ШСДжБ} ,,
  {QMŞSC} @-> {КъМШСДж} ,,
  {QASSR} @-> {КъАССР} ,,
  {QDMPU} @-> {КъДМПУ} ,,
  {QMPU} @-> {КъМПУ}
];
save defined crh-exceptions.bin
